zh-CN: 长笛管壁厚度: 厚管壁; 标准管壁; 薄管壁; 其他
nb: Fløyteveggtykkelse: Tykkvegg; Standard; Tynnvegg; Annet
ko: 플루트 관벽 두께: 헤비 월; 표준; 씬 월; 기타
da: Vægtykkelse for fløjte: Tyk væg; Standard; Tynd væg; Andet
fr: Épaisseur de paroi de la flûte: Paroi épaisse; Standard; Paroi fine; Autre
hu: Fuvolafal vastagsága: Vastag falú; Normál; Vékony falú; Egyéb
es: Espesor de la pared de la flauta: Pared gruesa; Estándar; Pared fina; Otro
tr: Flüt duvar kalınlığı: Kalın cidar; Standart; İnce cidar; Diğer
vi: Độ dày thành sáo: Thành ống dày; Tiêu chuẩn; Thành ống mỏng; Khác
th: ความหนาของผนังฟลุต: ผนังหนา; มาตรฐาน; ผนังบาง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Espessura da parede da flauta: Parede grossa; Padrão; Parede fina; Outro
ru: Толщина стенок флейты: Утолщенные стенки; Стандартные стенки; Тонкие стенки; Другое
pl: Grubość ścianki fletu: Gruba; Standardowa; Cienka; Inna
sl-SI: Debelina stene žleba: Debela stena; Standardna; Tanka stena; Drugo
lt-LT: Fleitos sienelės storis: Stora sienelė; Standartinė; Plona sienelė; Kita
pt-PT: Espessura da parede da flauta: Parede espessa; Padrão; Parede fina; Outro
el: Πάχος τοιχώματος φλάουτου: Παχύ τοίχωμα (Heavywall); Τυπικό; Λεπτό τοίχωμα (Thinwall); Άλλο
en: Flute wall thickness: Heavywall; Standard; Thinwall; Other
fi: Huilun seinämän paksuus: Paksu seinämä; Vakio; Ohut seinämä; Muu
ro-RO: Grosimea peretelui flautului: Perete gros; Standard; Perete subțire; Altele
sv: Flöjtväggstjocklek: Tjock vägg; Standard; Tunn vägg; Övrigt
de: Wandstärke der Flöte: Dickwandig; Standard; Dünnwandig; Sonstiges
cs: Tloušťka stěny flétny: Silnostěnná; Standardní; Tenkostěnná; Ostatní
ja: フルート壁の厚さ: ヘビーウォール; スタンダード; シンウォール; その他
sk-SK: Hrúbka steny flauty: Hrubá stena; Štandardná; Tenká stena; Iné
zh-TW: 長笛管壁厚度: 厚管壁; 標準管壁; 薄管壁; 其他
it: Spessore della parete del flauto: Spessore maggiorato; Standard; Spessore ridotto; Altro
bg-BG: Дебелина на стената на флейтата: Дебела стена; Стандартна; Тънка стена; Друга
hr-HR: Debljina stijenke žlijeba: Debela stijenka; Standardno; Tanka stijenka; Ostalo
nl: Fluit wanddikte: Dikwandig; Standaard; Dunwandig; Overige